Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-314 Duties of guardian. (a)
Except as otherwise limited by the court, a guardian shall make decisions
regarding the ward's support, care, education, health, and welfare. A guardian
shall exercise authority only as necessitated by the ward's limitations and, to
the extent possible, shall encourage the ward to participate in decisions, act
on the ward's own behalf, and develop or regain the capacity to manage the
ward's personal affairs. A guardian, in making decisions, shall consider the
expressed desires and personal values of the ward to the extent known to the
guardian. A guardian at all times shall act in the ward's best interest and
exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence.

(b) A guardian shall:

(1) Become or remain personally acquainted with the
ward and maintain sufficient contact with the ward to know of the ward's
capacities, limitations, needs, opportunities, and physical and mental health;

(2) Take reasonable care of the ward's personal
effects and bring protective proceedings if necessary to protect the property
of the ward;

(3) Expend money of the ward that has been received
by the guardian, for the ward's current needs for support, care, education,
health, and welfare;

(4) Conserve any excess money of the ward for the ward's
future needs; provided that if a conservator has been appointed for the estate
of the ward, the guardian shall pay the money to the conservator, at least
quarterly, to be conserved for the ward's future needs;

(5) Immediately notify the court if the ward's
condition has changed so that the ward is capable of exercising rights
previously removed; and

(6) Inform the court of any change in the ward's
custodial dwelling or address. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next